District of Columbia statutes.
2-1328

Compensation.

All members shall serve without compensation, but expenses incurred by the Commission as a whole, or by its individual members, when duly authorized by the Chairperson, will become an obligation against appropriated District of Columbia and federal funds designated for that purpose.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 408, 23 DCR 2543
1981 Ed., § 1-2328.
1973 Ed., § 6-1928.